District of Columbia statutes.
25-431

Review procedures — General provisions.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided herein, Board actions and procedures shall be governed by Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Board may meet in panels of at least 3 members for the purpose of conducting hearings and taking official actions. Three members shall constitute a quorum.

(c)

The Board may establish alternate procedures for uncontested, interim administrative proceedings or issuing stipulated licenses. Such procedures shall be submitted to the Council for approval as provided under § 25-211(b).

(d)

The Chair of the Board may appoint a Vice-Chair for the purposes of leading panels as provided for in this section.

(e)

For the purposes of this chapter, the Board may permit the Board of Directors of a licensee under a club license to designate a representative to represent it during proceedings before the Board.

(f)

Upon receipt of a complete application, the Board shall schedule an administrative review on the application. The administrative review shall not take place until after the close of the 45-day protest period. This administrative review may be conducted by a panel of 3 Board members.

(g)

Before any license is issued or renewed, and before any substantial change in the operation of a licensed establishment as determined by the Board under § 25-404, the Board shall ensure that proper notice has been provided to the public and that the public has been given at least 45 days in which to protest the license and that an administrative review has been conducted.

(h)

The administrative review shall be a non-adversarial proceeding held by the Board, at which hearing a list of applications for a new or renewed license or approval of substantial change in operation as under § 25-404, and the protestants thereto, shall be read to the public.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959